Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201844-8805
Registrations; term; renewal; application;
fee; federal training and continuing education requirements.

(1) Individual and entity
registrations shall expire one year after the date of issuance.

(2) An individual
navigator may file an application for renewal of a registration on a form
developed by the director and, unless preempted by federal law, shall pay
the renewal fee in an amount not to exceed twenty-five dollars as established
by the director, and an entity navigator may file an application for renewal
of a registration on a form developed by the director and, unless preempted
by federal law, shall pay the renewal fee in an amount not to exceed fifty
dollars as established by the director. An individual navigator who fails
to file prior to the expiration of the current registration for registration
renewal, unless preempted by federal law, shall pay a late fee in an amount
not to exceed fifty dollars as established by the director, and an entity
navigator that fails to file prior to the expiration of the current registration
for registration renewal, unless preempted by federal law, shall pay a late
fee in an amount not to exceed fifty dollars as established by the director.

(3) Any failure
to fulfill the federal ongoing training and continuing education requirements
shall result in the expiration of the registration.

Laws 2013, LB568, § 5.